California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

1086.

No witness shall be compelled to attend as a witness before the board under this division out of the county in which he resides, unless the distance is less than 150 miles from his place of residence to the place of hearing, except that the board, upon affidavit of any party showing that the testimony of such witness is material and necessary, may indorse on the subpoena an order requiring the attendance of such witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compelling Attendance [1090. - 1097.]

1090.

The superior court of the county in which any proceeding is held by the board may compel the attendance and giving of testimony by witnesses and the production of evidence as required by any subpena issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1091.

In case of the refusal of any witness to attend or testify or produce any evidence required by a subpena issued by it, the board may report by petition to the superior court in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1092.

The petition shall set forth the following:

(a) That due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of the witness or for the production of evidence and that the witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(b) That the witness has failed and refused to attend or produce the evidence required by the subpena before the board in the proceeding named in the notice and subpena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the course of the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1093.

The petition shall ask an order of court compelling the witness to attend, testify, and produce the evidence before the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1094.

The court, upon the petition of the board, shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place fixed by the court in the order and not more than 10 days from the date of the order, and then and there show cause, if any he have, why he refused to obey the subpena, or refused to answer questions propounded to him by the board, or neglected, failed, or refused to produce before the board the evidence called for in the subpena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.

A copy of the order and of the petition shall be served upon the witness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

If it appears to the court that the subpena was regularly issued, the court shall thereupon enter an order that the witness appear before the board at the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required evidence or both testify and produce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.

Upon failure to obey the order the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Depositions [1100. - 1100.]

1100.

The board or any party to a proceeding before it may, in any investigation or hearing, cause the deposition of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for depositions in civil actions in the superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Immunity [1105. - 1106.]

1105.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), no person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any evidence in any investigation or inquiry by or hearing before the board upon the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to any penalty.

(b) The board may grant immunity to any person who is compelled to testify or to produce documentary evidence before the board and who invokes the privilege
 against self-incrimination.

(c) If the board does not grant immunity after a person invokes the privilege against self-incrimination, the board shall excuse the person from giving any testimony or producing any evidence to which the privilege against self-incrimination applies, and the board shall dismiss, continue, or limit the scope of the proceedings as necessary to ensure that the unavailability of the testimony or evidence does not deny due process of law to any party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

No person who is granted immunity under subdivision (b) of Section 1105 shall be criminally prosecuted or be subjected to any criminal penalty for or on account of any act, transaction, matter, or thing material to the matter under investigation by the board concerning which he or she has been compelled as a witness to testify or to produce documentary evidence pursuant to the granting of immunity; but no person so testifying or producing shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for any perjury committed by him or her in that testimony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 45, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. State Water Resources Control Board Administrative Hearings Office [1110. - 1114.]

1110.

(a) There is within the board an Administrative Hearings Office. The board shall administer the Administrative Hearings Office as an independent organizational unit consistent with the role of the Administrative Hearings Office as a neutral, fair, and efficient forum for adjudications. The Administrative Hearings Office shall be overseen by a presiding hearing officer.

(b) The purpose of the Administrative Hearings Office is to provide qualified, impartial hearing officers, to ensure that water rights matters, including water-related cannabis enforcement matters, are resolved in a timely manner, and to provide the board flexibility to assign hearing officers to other
 matters, such as those involving water right change petitions and other matters concerning water right permits and licenses.

(c) The Administrative Hearings Office shall conduct adjudicative hearings pursuant to this chapter in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Except as otherwise provided in Section 1113 or the regulations of the board, this section does not limit the discretion of the board where Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code makes the applicability of a procedure or requirement discretionary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 2 of Stats. 2018, Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

(a) The Administrative Hearings Office shall include attorneys qualified to act as hearing officers in adjudicative proceedings involving water rights matters. The hearing officers shall have qualifications equivalent to those of administrative law judges and knowledge and experience in water law.

(b) The board shall designate a hearing officer to serve as the presiding hearing officer.

(c) The presiding hearing officer shall have authority to supervise the Administrative Hearings Office, including, but not limited to, the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Hire personnel, including technical experts.

(2) Assign matters to hearing officers.

(3) Reassign matters as convenience and necessity require.

(4) Serve as a hearing officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 282.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 2 of Stats. 2018, Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a hearing officer from the Administrative Hearings Office shall preside over a hearing in any of the following matters:

(1) A complaint issued under Section 1055.

(2) A notice of a proposed cease and desist order issued under Section 1834.

(3) A notice of a revocation of a permit issued under Section 1410 or revocation of a license issued under Section 1675.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the hearing notice includes, in addition to a proceeding under
 subdivision (a), consideration of a decision or order on a matter not subject to subdivision (a).

(c) In an adjudicative hearing presided over by the board or a board member, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Upon request by the board, a hearing officer from the Administrative Hearings Office shall assist the board or board member in conducting the hearing.

(2) The board may assign an adjudicative hearing, in whole or in part, to the Administrative Hearings Office.

(d) A hearing officer may perform additional work requested by the board, including, but not limited to, presiding over hearings on nonadjudicative matters, mediations, and overseeing investigations.

(e) A hearing officer may only perform the work specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) if the additional work does not conflict with the officer’s primary responsibility to serve as a hearing officer for matters listed in subdivision (a) and to resolve those matters in a timely manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 13.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

In accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 1110, the Administrative Adjudication Code of Ethics (Article 16 (commencing with Section 11475) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall apply to hearing officers of the Administrative Hearings Office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 2 of Stats. 2018, Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.

(a) Proposed and final orders in an adjudicative proceeding presided over by a hearing officer from the Administrative Hearings Office shall be prepared in accordance with this section.

(b) In a proceeding presided over by a hearing officer for administrative civil liability under Section 1847 or 5107, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Within 90 days after the matter is submitted, the hearing officer shall adopt a final order that meets the requirements of Section 11425.50 of the Government Code. If the hearing officer finds that a delay is required by special circumstances, the hearing officer
 shall issue an order delaying the final order for no more than 30 days and specifying the reasons for the delay. Failure of the hearing officer to adopt a final order within the time required shall not prejudice the rights of any party in the case.

(2) A final order adopted under this subdivision is subject to review as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120).

(c) In a proceeding presided over by a hearing officer other than a proceeding under subdivision (b), all of the following apply:

(1) Within 90 days after the matter is submitted, the hearing officer shall prepare a proposed order in a form that meets the requirements of Section 11425.50 of the Government Code and may be adopted by the board as the final order in
 the case. If the hearing officer finds that a delay is required by special circumstances, the hearing officer shall issue an order delaying the proposed order for no more than 30 days and specifying the reasons for the delay. Failure of the hearing officer to deliver a proposed order within the time required shall not prejudice the rights of any party in the case. A copy of the proposed order shall be served on all parties to the proceeding and posted on the board’s Internet Web site on the same day that it is provided to the board.

(2) Within 90 days after receipt of the hearing officer’s proposed order, the board may do any of the following:

(A) Adopt the proposed order in its entirety.

(B) Reduce or otherwise
 mitigate the proposed administrative civil liability and adopt the balance of the proposed order.

(C) Make technical or other minor changes in the proposed order and adopt it as the board’s order. Action under this subparagraph is limited to a clarifying change or a change of a similar nature that does not materially change the factual or legal basis of the proposed order.

(D) Reject the proposed order and remand the case to the same hearing officer if reasonably available, otherwise to another hearing officer from the Administrative Hearings Office, for further proceedings. If the board remands the matter to a hearing officer pursuant to this subparagraph, the hearing officer shall prepare a revised proposed order, as provided in paragraph (1), based upon the record of the
 prior hearing and any additional evidence admitted in the proceeding. A copy of the revised proposed order shall be served on all parties to the proceeding and posted on the board’s Internet Web site on the same day it is provided to the board. The board may remand a proceeding pursuant to this subparagraph only once.

(E) Reject the proposed order, and decide the case upon the record, including the transcript, or upon an agreed statement of the parties, with or without taking additional evidence. By stipulation of the parties, the board may decide the case upon the record without including the transcript. If the board acts pursuant to this subparagraph, all of the following provisions apply:

(i) The board shall make available a copy of the record to the parties and may require
 payment of fees covering only the direct costs of making the copy.

(ii) The board shall afford the parties the opportunity to present either oral or written argument before the board.

(iii) The authority of the board to decide a case pursuant to this subparagraph includes the authority to adopt portions of the hearing officer’s recommended order, as provided in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, while deciding for itself the remaining issues in the case.

(iv) If the board elects to proceed under this subparagraph, the board shall issue its final order no later than 90 days after rejection of the proposed order, or no later than 90 days after its receipt of the transcript if the board has ordered a transcript of the proceedings
 before the hearing officer.

(v) If the board finds that further delay is required by special circumstances, the board shall issue an order delaying the issuance of its final order by no more than 30 days and specifying the reasons for that delay.

(3) After 90 days following receipt of the proposed order, if the board fails to act as prescribed in paragraph (2) or fails to issue a rejection under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2), the proposed order shall be deemed adopted by the board.

(4) Within 30 days of receipt of the hearing officer’s proposed order, any interested party may submit a written request to the board describing which of the actions authorized by paragraph (2) the party requests
 the board to take, including an explanation of the reasons for the party’s request. The board shall consider all requests submitted pursuant to this paragraph when it acts on the hearing officer’s proposed order.

(d) (1) The time limits for issuance of a proposed order and board action under this section do not apply to a proceeding that the hearing officer determines to be complex because it involves any of the following:

(A) Novel and difficult legal or factual issues.

(B) A large number of parties.

(C) Numerous witnesses.

(D) A large amount of documentary evidence.

(E) Coordination with related proceedings.

(2) A proceeding is deemed to be complex if it is a reference from a court under Section 2000 or a statutory adjudication under Section 2525.

(3) If a hearing officer determines a proceeding to be complex, or a proceeding is deemed to be complex pursuant to paragraph (2), the hearing officer shall establish a hearing management plan and monitor the proceeding to ensure timely disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Reconsideration, Amendment, and Judicial Review of Water Right Decisions and Orders [1120. - 1126.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1120. - 1121.]

1120.

This chapter applies to any decision or order issued under this part or Section 275, Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200), Part 2 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 6, Part 2.55 (commencing with Section 10608) of Division 6, or Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6, Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7, or the public trust doctrine, and to any information order issued under Article 3 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 3 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

The board shall serve a copy of a decision or order on the parties by personal delivery, certified mail, in accordance with the manner of service of a summons under Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 416.10) of, Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or by any method of physical delivery that provides a receipt. For purposes of this section, “physical delivery that provides a receipt” includes physical delivery methods that provide electronic confirmation of delivery to the intended address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 3.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reconsideration and Amendment of Decisions and Orders [1122. - 1124.]

1122.

The board may order a reconsideration of all or part of a decision or order on the board’s own motion or on the filing of a petition of any interested person or entity. The petition shall be filed not later than 30 days from the date the board adopts a decision or order. The authority of the board to order a reconsideration on its own motion shall expire 30 days after it has adopted a decision or order. The board shall order or deny reconsideration on a petition therefor not later than 90 days from the date the board adopts the decision or
 order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 315, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1123.

The decision or order may be reconsidered by the board on all the pertinent parts of the record and such argument as may be permitted, or a further hearing may be held, upon notice to all interested persons, for the purpose of receiving such additional evidence as the board may, for cause, allow. The decision or order on reconsideration shall have the same force and effect as an original order or decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1124.

The board at any time may amend or modify a decision or order to correct any obvious typographical or clerical error or oversight without the necessity of notice and a hearing thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Review by Court of Decisions and Orders [1126. - 1126.]

1126.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all issues relating to state water law decided by the board be reviewed in state courts, if a party seeks judicial review. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the courts assert jurisdiction and exercise discretion to fashion appropriate remedies pursuant to Section 389 of the Code of Civil Procedure to facilitate the resolution of state water
 rights issues in state courts.

(b) Any party aggrieved by any decision or order may, not later than 30 days from the date of final action by the board, file a petition for a writ of mandate for review of the decision or order. Except in cases where the decision or order is issued under authority delegated to an officer or employee of the board, reconsideration before the board is not an administrative remedy that is required to be exhausted before filing a petition for writ of mandate. The time for filing the petition for writ of mandate and the time for filing an action or proceeding in which the board is a respondent under Section 21167 of the Public Resources Code shall be extended for any person who seeks reconsideration by the board pursuant to this article. The amendment of this subdivision made during the 2001 portion of the 2001–02 Regular Session does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(c) Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern judicial proceedings under this section. For the purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence in any case involving the judicial review of a cease and desist order issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1831) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 2, and in any other case in which the court is authorized by law to exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(d) If no aggrieved party petitions for a writ of mandate within the time provided by this section, the decision or order of the board is not subject to review by any court.

(e) In any court case reviewing a decision or order by the board relating to a permit or license to appropriate
 water held by the state through the department or any other state agency, or to a permit or license to appropriate water held by the United States through the Bureau of Reclamation or any other federal agency, the election by the United States, or any agency thereof, not to be a party shall not, in and of itself, be the basis for dismissal pursuant to Section 389 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 312.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. APPROPRIATION OF WATER [1200. - 1851.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1200. - 1248.]



  ARTICLE 1. Water Subject to Appropriation [1200. - 1203.]

1200.

Whenever the terms stream, lake or other body of water, or water occurs in relation to applications to appropriate water or permits or licenses issued pursuant to such applications, such term refers only to surface water, and to subterranean streams flowing through known and definite channels.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

All water flowing in any natural channel, excepting so far as it has been or is being applied to useful and beneficial purposes upon, or in so far as it is or may be reasonably needed for useful and beneficial purposes upon lands riparian thereto, or otherwise appropriated, is hereby declared to be public water of the State and subject to appropriation in accordance with the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

The following are hereby declared to constitute unappropriated water:

(a) All water which has never been appropriated.

(b) All water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914, which has not been in process, from the date of the initial act of appropriation, of being put, with due diligence in proportion to the magnitude of the work necessary properly to utilize it for the purpose of the appropriation, or which has not been put, or which has ceased to be put to some useful or beneficial purpose.

(c) All water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code which has ceased to be put to the useful or beneficial purpose for which it was appropriated, or which has been or may be or may have been appropriated and is not or has not been in the process of being put, from the date of the initial act of appropriation, to the useful or beneficial purpose for which it was appropriated, with due diligence in proportion to the magnitude of the work necessary properly to utilize it for the purpose of the appropriation.

(d) Water which having been appropriated or used flows back into a stream, lake or other body of water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

Any water the right to the use of which is held by any municipality which is in excess of the existing municipal needs therefor may be appropriated by any person entitled to the possession of land upon which such excess water may be put to beneficial use but the right of such person to use such water shall continue only for such period as the water is not needed by the municipality. This section supplements but does not otherwise affect Sections 1460 to 1464, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1344.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Declaration of Fully Appropriated Stream System [1205. - 1207.]

1205.

(a) Following notice and hearing, the board may adopt a declaration that a stream system is fully appropriated. As used in this article, “stream system” includes stream, lake, or other body of water, and tributaries and contributory sources, but does not include an underground water supply other than a subterranean stream following through known and definite channels.

(b) A declaration that a stream system is fully appropriated shall contain a finding that the supply of water in the stream system is being fully applied to beneficial uses where the board finds that previous water rights decisions have determined that no water remains available for appropriation.

(c) Upon its own motion or upon petition of any interested person, and following notice and hearing, the board may revoke or revise a declaration that a stream system is fully appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

(a) From and after the date of adoption of a declaration that a stream system is fully appropriated, and subject to subdivision (b), the board shall not accept for filing any application for a permit to appropriate water from the stream system described in that declaration, and the board may cancel any application pending on that date.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board may provide, in any declaration that a stream system is fully appropriated, for acceptance for filing of applications to appropriate water under specified conditions. Any provision to that effect shall specify the conditions and may contain application limitations, including, but not limited to, limitations on the purpose of use, on the instantaneous rate of diversion, on the season of diversion, and on the amount of water which may be diverted annually. The board may make those limitations applicable to individual applications to appropriate water, or to the aggregate of the applications, or to both.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to applications for temporary permits made pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 1425) or to any provision of this code respecting change in point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

Notice of hearing pursuant to this article shall be given as follows:

(a) The notice shall be published at least once a week for four consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation published in each county in which any part of the stream system is situated, and publication shall be complete at least 60 days prior to the date of hearing.

(b) At least 60 days prior to the date of the hearing, the notice shall be mailed to all persons known to the board who own land that appears to be riparian to the stream system, who divert water from the stream system, or who have made written request to the board for special notice of hearing pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Treated Waste Water [1210. - 1212.]

1210.

The owner of a waste water treatment plant operated for the purpose of treating wastes from a sanitary sewer system shall hold the exclusive right to the treated waste water as against anyone who has supplied the water discharged into the waste water collection and treatment system, including a person using water under a water service contract, unless otherwise provided by agreement.

Nothing in this article shall affect the treatment plant owner’s obligations to any legal user of the discharged treated waste water.

Nothing in this article is intended to interfere with the regulatory authority of the board or any California regional water quality control board under Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1211.

(a) Prior to making any change in the point of discharge, place of use, or purpose of use of treated wastewater, the owner of any wastewater treatment plant shall obtain approval of the board for that change. The board shall review the changes pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to changes in the discharge or use of treated wastewater that do not result in decreasing the flow in any portion of a watercourse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 315, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1212.

The board shall not grant any permit or license to any person other than the treated waste water producer for the appropriation of treated waste water where the producer has introduced such water into the watercourse with the prior stated intention of maintaining or enhancing fishery, wildlife, recreational, or other instream beneficial uses. Holders of existing water rights may not use or claim such water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Areas of Origin [1215. - 1222.]

1215.

This article shall only apply to a water supplier exporting or intending to export water for use outside a protected area pursuant to applications to appropriate surface water filed, or groundwater appropriations initiated, after January 1, 1985, that are not subject to Section 11460.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.5.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “protected area”, means all of lands which normally drain to the ocean, to a hydraulic sink, or to another state within any of the following, and only the following, river systems:

(1) The Sacramento River System.

(2) The Mokelumne River System.

(3) The Calaveras River System.

(4) The San Joaquin River System.

(5) The Mono Lake System.

(6) The combined Truckee, Walker, and Carson River Systems.

(7) The combined river systems which drain to the ocean from and including the Russian River System northward to the California-Oregon border.

(b) The confluences of the Sacramento, Mokelumne, Calaveras, and San Joaquin River Systems are within the delta, as defined in Section 12220, and the delta shall be considered to be within each of these protected areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.6.

For the purposes of this article, “water user or users” within a protected area means an appropriator or appropriators, a riparian user or users, or a groundwater user or users of water on land owned or controlled by them within a protected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

A protected area shall not be deprived directly or indirectly of the prior right to all the water reasonably required to adequately supply the beneficial needs of the protected area, or any of the inhabitants or property owners therein, by a water supplier exporting or intending to export water for use outside a protected area pursuant to applications to appropriate surface water filed, or groundwater appropriations initiated, after January 1, 1985, that are not subject to Section 11460.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

(a) In addition to the right to obtain a water right which would have priority over the rights of an exporter, water users in a protected area shall have the right to purchase, for adequate compensation, water made available by the construction of any works by a water supplier exporting or intending to export water for use outside the protected area. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize export of water from a protected area to which users within the protected area are otherwise entitled, nor to require users within a protected area to pay for water to which they are otherwise entitled.

(b) At the request of a water user or users within a protected area, a water supplier exporting or intending to export water for use outside the protected area who is subject to Section 1216 shall meet and negotiate in good faith for the purpose of entering into contracts for the purchase of water as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Any water user or users in a protected area may bring an action in the superior court to require compliance with the duty to meet and negotiate in good faith pursuant to this section. The court may issue a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, as appropriate, to secure compliance with this section.

(d) The meetings and negotiations required by this section may occur between the water supplier exporting water for use outside a protected area and any water user or users in a protected area, as determined appropriate by the parties. The meetings and negotiations shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the authority of the board to establish water quality standards or to subject water right entitlements to terms and conditions for the protection of reasonable and beneficial uses consistent with the provisions of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

Upon the request of an applicant for a permit to appropriate water for use outside a protected area, a county of origin shall cooperate with the applicant in estimating the amount of water that may be purchased within the county pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1217 and that may be developed or used within the county impacting the proposed project, including an estimated time schedule.

The purpose of this section is to assist the applicant in planning the export project and to assist the counties of origin in their water planning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

A water supplier exporting or intending to export water outside a protected area, or a water user or users within a protected area, may declare that an impasse has been reached between the parties in negotiations over matters within the scope of negotiations specified in Section 1217 and may request the director to appoint a panel of five disinterested persons from whom the parties shall select, by a process of elimination, the mediator. After drawing lots to determine the order, the parties shall each, in turn, eliminate a name from the panel until there is only one person remaining on the panel, who shall be the mediator. The mediator shall meet forthwith with the parties or their representatives, either jointly or separately, and shall take such other steps as the mediator may deem appropriate in order to persuade the parties to resolve their differences and effect a mutually acceptable agreement. The services of the mediator, including any per diem fees, and actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses, shall be provided by the parties. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the parties from mutually agreeing upon their own mediation procedure, and in the event of such agreement, the director shall not appoint a mediator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.5.

The provisions of this article shall not require any water supplier exporting or intending to export water for use outside a protected area to furnish to any water user or users in a protected area claiming rights under this article, without adequate compensation therefor, any water made available for domestic, municipal, industrial, or agricultural uses by the construction of any works by the water exporter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1655, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1220.

(a) No groundwater shall be pumped for export from within the combined Sacramento and Delta-Central Sierra Basins, as defined in the Department of Water Resources’ Bulletin 160-74, unless the pumping is in compliance with a groundwater management plan that is adopted by ordinance pursuant to subdivision (b) by the county board of supervisors, in full consultation with affected water districts, and that is subsequently approved by a vote in the counties or portions of counties that overlie the groundwater basin, except that water that has seeped into the underground from any reservoir, afterbay, or other facility of an export project may be returned to the water supply of the export project. For the purposes of this section, the county board of supervisors may designate a county water agency to act on its behalf if the directors of the county water agency are publicly elected and the county water agency encompasses the entire county. The county board of supervisors may revoke that designation by resolution at any time.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county board of supervisors whose county contains part of the combined Sacramento and Delta-Central Sierra Basins may adopt groundwater management plans to implement the purposes of this section.

(c) A county board of supervisors shall not exercise the powers authorized by this section within the boundaries of another local agency supplying water to that area without the prior agreement of the governing body of that other local agency.
